src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-A-inakat_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Verb - inakat - ok : # -m animate transitive verb, bring to town AEW NA1
     inakat+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitsinakato
     inakat+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitsinakatawa
     inakat+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4SgO: nitsinakatayini
     inakat+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitsinakakki
     inakat+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitsinakatawa
     inakat+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4SgO: kitsinakatayini
     inakat+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitsinakakka
     inakat+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kitsinakakka
     inakat+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4SgO: inakatsiiwa
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3SgO: otsinakakka
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2SgO: kitsinakakkini
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1SgO: nitsinakakkini
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: inakatsiiyi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4SgO: otsinakakkini
     
     inakat+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitsinakatohpinnaana
     inakat+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nitsinakatannaani
     inakat+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4PlO: nitsinakatannaani
     inakat+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: inakatayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4PlO: inakatayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitsinakakkihpinnaana
     inakat+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kitsinakatawaayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4PlO: kitsinakatawaayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nitsinakakkinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kitsinakakkoaayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4PlO: inakatsiiyi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1PlO: nitsinakakkinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2PlO: kitsinakakkoaayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3PlO: otsinakakkoaayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: inakatsiiyi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4PlO: otsinakakkoaayini
 
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1SgO: nitsinakakkoo
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1PlO: nitsinakattsspinnaana
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2SgO: kitsinakakkoo
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2PlO: kitsinakattsspoaawa
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+21PlO: inakattssp
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: inakatawa
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3PlO: inakatayi
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4SgO: inakatayini
     inakat+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4PlO: inakatayi

     inakat+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: kitsinakatohsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: nitsinakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4SgO: nitsinakatahsini
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: kitsinakakkssi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: kitsinakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4SgO: kitsinakatahsini
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: nitsinakatssi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: kitsinakatssi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4SgO: otsinakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3SgO: otsinakatssi

     inakat+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: kitsinakatohsinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: nitsinakatahsinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4PlO: nitsinakatahsinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3PlO: inakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4PlO: inakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: kitsinakakkssinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: kitsinakatahsoaayi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4PlO: kitsinakatahsoaayi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: nitsinakatssinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+21PlO: nitsinakakkssi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: kitsinakatssoaayi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4PlO: otsinakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+4PlO: otsinakatssi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3PlO: otsinakatssi

     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1SgO: nitsinakakkoohsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1PlO: nitsinakattssinnaani
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2SgO: kitsinakakkoohsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2PlO: kitsinakattssoaayi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+21PlO: inakattssi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3SgO: inakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3PlO: inakatahsi
     inakat+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+4SgO: inakatahsini

     inakat+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2SgO: inakatsiniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: inakatainiki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1SgO: inakakkiiniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: inakatainiki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: inakattsiiniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: inakattsiiniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4SgO: inakatasi
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3SgO: inakattsiiniki

     inakat+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2PlO: inakatsinoainiki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: inakatainiki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1PlO: inakakkinnaaniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: inakatainiki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: inakattsiinnaaniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+21PlO: inakakkisi
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: inakattsiinoainiki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4PlO: inakatasi
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3PlO: inakattsiinoainiki

     inakat+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1SgO: inakakkoiniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1PlO: inakakkoinnaaniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2SgO: inakakkoiniki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2PlO: inakakkoinoainiki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+21PlO: inakattsski
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3SgO: inakatahki
     inakat+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3PlO: inakatahki

     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1SgO: inakakkit
     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1PlO: inakakkinnaana
     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: inakatsis
     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: inakatsis
     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1SgO: inakakkik
     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1PlO: inakakkinnaana
     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: inakatok
     inakat+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: inakatok

     inakat+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitsinakattsiiyihpinnaana , nitsinakattsiiyihpinnaan ]
     
